District of Columbia statutes.
16-707

Disposition of fines.

(a)

All fines payable and paid under judgment of the criminal division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall, upon their payment, immediately become, in contemplation of law, the property of the United States or the District of Columbia, according to the charge upon which the fine may be adjudged. Every person receiving such a fine shall be deemed in law an agent of the United States or the District, as the case may be.

(b)

This section does not affect the ultimate rights under existing law of the Washington Humane Society of the District of Columbia, in or to any fines paid in the criminal division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(6)
1973 Ed., § 16-707.
1981 Ed., § 16-707.
This section is referenced in § 16-708.